Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-828
Authority; charge for services.

The
authority may charge and collect rates, rents, fees, and other charges for
the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by a project
or any portion thereof and contract with any person, partnership, limited
liability company, association, or corporation or other body public or private,
except that the authority shall have no jurisdiction over rates, rents, fees,
and charges established by an eligible institution for its
students, patients, residents,
clients, or other consumers other than to require that such rates,
rents, fees, and charges by such eligible institution
be sufficient to discharge such institution's obligation to the authority.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 520;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2925;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1725;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 28.